cs: Typ kol: Nafukovací; Pevná; Jiné
pt-BR: Tipo de roda: Inflável; Maciço; Outro
zh-TW: 輪胎類型: 充氣式; 實心; 其他
nl: Wieltype: Opblaasbaar; Stevig; Andere
zh-CN: 车轮类型: 膨胀; 坚固; 其他
en: Wheel type: Inflatable; Solid; Other
de: Radtyp: Aufblasbar; Solide; Sonstiges
ro-RO: Tip roată: Gonflabilă; Solidă; Altele
ru: Тип колеса: Надувное; Цельное; Другое
sl-SI: Vrsta kolesa: Napihljiv; Trden; Drugo
vi: Loại bánh xe: Lốp bơm hơi; Lốp rắn; Khác
tr: Tekerlek Tipi: Şişirilebilir; Düz; Diğer
nb: Hjultype: Oppblåsbar; Fast; Annet
th: ประเภทล้อ: เติมลม; โซลิด; อื่นๆ
fr: Type de roue: Gonflable; Solide; Autre
es: Tipo de rueda: Inflable; Sólido; Otros
ko: 휠 유형: 공기주입식; 솔리드; 기타
da: Hjultype: Oppustelig; Solid; Andet
pt-PT: Tipo de roda: Insuflável; Sólido; Outro
el: Τύπος τροχού: Φουσκωτή; Στερεάς μορφής; Άλλο
hu: Kerék típusa: Felfújható; Szilárd; Egyéb
hr-HR: Vrsta kotača: Na napuhavanje; Čvrsti; Ostalo
sv: Hjultyp: Uppblåsbar; Solid; Övrigt
it: Tipo di ruota: Gonfiabile; Solido; Altro
sk-SK: Typ kolesa: Nafukovací; Solid; Iné
fi: Pyörätyyppi: Täytettävä; Kiinteä; Muu
pl: Typ koła: Nadmuchiwana; Stały; Inne
lt-LT: Rato tipas: Pripučiamas; Kietas; Kita
bg-BG: Тип колело: Надуваемо; Твърдо; Други
ja: ホイールの種類: インフレータブル; ソリッド; その他